Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-208
Attorney General; actions involving use of waters in interstate streams; special counsel; expense.

The Attorney General is authorized to employ such assistance and incur such expenses as shall be necessary in any such actions.

Laws 1915, c. 223, § 2, p. 492;

C.S.1922, §§ 4842, 4843;

C.S.1929, § 84-209;

R.S.1943, § 84-208.